Missouri, session 2026, SB1562.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 630, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
one new section, to be known as section 630.230, to read as
follows:
630.230. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "988", the three-digit number that offers
statewide access to crisis services via call, text, or chat
twenty-four hours per day, seven days per week;
(2) "CMRS provider", an entity authorized by the
Federal Communications Commission to provide commercial
mobile radio service within the state;
(3) "Commercial mobile radio service" or "CMRS", a
mobile telecommunications service as defined in the federal
Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. Section
124, as amended;
(4) "Crisis services", core behavioral health crisis
services including, but not limited to, 988 call, text, or
chat; mobile crisis response services; and behavioral health
crisis center operations and services;

SB 1562 2
(5) "Dealer", a person who sells prepaid CMRS to an
end user;
(6) "End user", a person who purchases prepaid CMRS in
a retail transaction;
(7) "Open access services", services available for
uninsured or underinsured individuals in need of behavioral
health services;
(8) "Place of primary use", the same meaning given to
the term in the federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing
Act, 4 U.S.C. Section 124, as amended;
(9) "Postpaid CMRS", a commercial mobile radio service
that is not prepaid CMRS;
(10) "Prepaid CMRS", a commercial mobile radio service
that allows a caller to dial 988 to access the 988 system
when commercial mobile radio service is required to be paid
for in advance and is sold in predetermined units or dollars
of which the number declines with use in a known amount;
(11) "Prepaid wireless charge", the charge that is
required to be collected by a dealer from an end user in the
amount established under subsection 2 of this section;
(12) "Retail transaction", the purchase of prepaid
CMRS from a dealer for any purpose other than resale. If
more than one item or article of prepaid CMRS is purchased
by an end user, each item or article purchased shall be
deemed to be a separate retail transaction.
2. (1) Each dealer shall collect a prepaid CMRS
wireless 988 charge of sixty-five cents from the end user
for prepaid wireless telecommunication devices or services
with respect to each retail transaction occurring in the
state.
(2) Each CMRS provider and each reseller of CMRS shall
collect a monthly postpaid wireless 988 charge of sixty-five

SB 1562 3
cents per access line from each of its customers whose place
of primary use is within the state. The charge shall be
billed with respect to customers of postpaid CMRS by each
CMRS provider and reseller of CMRS on each CMRS device
capable of two-way interactive voice communication.
(3) The amount of the prepaid wireless charge that is
collected by a dealer from an end user, if such amount is
separately stated on an invoice, receipt, or other similar
document provided to the consumer by the seller, shall not
be included in the base for measuring any tax, fee,
surcharge, or other charge that is imposed by this state,
any political subdivision of this state, or any
intergovernmental agency.
3. (1) All revenues from taxes and fees imposed under
this section shall be utilized by the department of mental
health for the operation of crisis services and open access
services.
(2) All taxes and fees collected under this section
shall be remitted to the director of the department of
revenue. The director of the department of revenue shall
deposit such payments into the 988 crisis continuum fund
established in this section.
(3) All service charges imposed under this section
together with all taxes imposed under the sales tax law of
the state of Missouri shall be reported upon such forms and
under such administrative rules and regulations as may be
prescribed by the director of the department of revenue.
4. (1) There is hereby created in the state treasury
the "988 Crisis Continuum Fund", which shall consist of
taxes and fees collected under this section as well as any
moneys appropriated to it by the general assembly and any
gifts, grants, donations, or bequests received from federal,

SB 1562 4
private, or other sources. The state treasurer shall be
custodian of the fund. In accordance with sections 30.170
and 30.180, the state treasurer may approve disbursements.
The fund shall be a dedicated fund and, upon appropriation,
moneys in this fund shall be used by the department of
mental health for the purposes set forth in subsection 3 of
this section.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of section 33.080
to the contrary, any moneys remaining in the fund at the end
of the biennium shall not revert to the credit of the
general revenue fund.
(3) The state treasurer shall invest moneys in the
fund in the same manner as other funds are invested. Any
interest and moneys earned on such investments shall be
credited to the fund.
5. The director of the department of revenue shall
promulgate all necessary rules and regulations for the
administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a
rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
100 created under the authority delegated in this section shall
101 become effective only if it complies with and is subject to
102 all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable,
103 section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are
104 nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the
105 general assembly pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay
106 the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
107 subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of
108 rulemaking authority and any rule proposed or adopted after
109 August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✓